District of Columbia statutes.
47-1810.09

Tax haven updates.

(a)

The Council shall review the list of tax havens set forth in § 47-1801.04(49)(B-i) biennially or as needed.

(b)

The Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia (“CFO”) may submit amendments, as the CFO considers necessary, to the Council for revision by act of the list of tax havens.

Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 7182(b), 62 DCR 10905
For temporary (90 days) repeal of section, see § 6(c) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Second Budget Support Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-202, Nov. 23, 2015, 62 DCR 15276).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 21-36, § 7182(d), an applicability clause, see § 2(d) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-164, Oct. 16, 2015, 62 DCR 13734).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 6(c) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2016 (D.C. Act 21-307, Feb. 18, 2016, 63 DCR 2182).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 7152(b) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
For temporary (225 days) repeal of this section, see § 14(c) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-76, Feb. 27, 2016, 63 DCR 264).